Georgia, session 2025_26, HB792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to magistrate courts, is amended by revising paragraph (5) of
subsection (a) of Code Section 15-10-2, relating to general jurisdiction and authority of
magistrate to act, as follows:
"(5) The trial of civil claims including garnishment and attachment in which exclusive
jurisdiction is not vested in the superior court and the amount demanded or the value of
the property claimed does not exceed $15,000.00 $30,000.00, provided that no
prejudgment attachment may be granted;"
H. B. 792
- 1 -

LC 48 1588
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 792
- 2 -